District of Columbia statutes.
19-1308.05

Costs of administration.

In administering a trust, the trustee may incur only costs that are reasonable in relation to the trust property, the purposes of the trust, and the skills of the trustee.

Mar. 10, 2004, D.C. Law 15-104, § 2(b), 51 DCR 208

History

Uniform Law: This section is based upon § 805 of the Uniform Trust Code.

Editor's Notes